Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB187.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.311 is amended to read as follows:
Any branch budget bill enacted by the General Assembly shall be enacted so that each
section, each subsection, and each appropriation sum by specified fund or funds accounts
shall be a separate and specific appropriation and law. If any section, any subsection, any
paragraph, or any provision is found by a court of competent jurisdiction in a final,
unappealable order to be invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts shall not
affect or impair any of the remaining sections, subsections, paragraphs, or provisions
contained in that branch budget bill.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2026 10:34 AM Jacketed